District of Columbia statutes.
47-444

Audits.

Article VIII of the Multistate Tax Compact, as set forth in § 47-441, shall be in full force and effect in and with respect to the District of Columbia.

History

July 18, 1981, D.C. Law 4-17, § 5, 28 DCR 2368
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-444.